District of Columbia statutes.
11-2504

Censure, suspension, or disbarment by other courts.

The Federal courts in the District of Columbia and the Superior Court may censure, suspend, or expel an attorney from the practice at their respective bars, for a crime involving moral turpitude, or professional misconduct, or conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice. If an attorney is expelled from practice under this section, the court expelling that attorney shall notify the other Federal courts in the District of Columbia and the District of Columbia Court of Appeals of the action taken.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(115), 108 Stat. 713

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-2504.
1973 Ed., § 11-2504.